California, session 20252026, AB1777.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 39602.5 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:39602.5. (a) The state board shall adopt rules and regulations pursuant to Section 43013 that, in conjunction with other measures adopted by the state board, the districts, and the United States Environmental Protection Agency, will achieve ambient air quality standards required by the federal Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 7401 et seq.) in all areas of the state by the applicable attainment date, and to maintain these standards thereafter. The state board shall adopt these measures if they are necessary, technologically feasible, and cost effective, consistent with Section 43013.(b) If necessary to carry out its duties under this section, the state board shall adopt and enforce rules and regulations that anticipate the development of new technologies or the improvement of existing technologies. The rules and regulations shall require standards that the state board finds and determines can likely be achieved by the compliance date set forth in the rule.(c) (1) If necessary to carry out its duties under this section, the state board may adopt regulations to reduce or mitigate emissions from indirect sources of pollution.(2) The Legislature finds and declares that paragraph (1) is declaratory of, and does not constitute a change in, existing law.(d) For purposes of this section, “indirect source” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 7410(a)(5)(C) of Title 42 of the United States Code.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.